Massachusetts, session 194th, H3508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to study and provide recommendations on the feasibility of eliminating
gasoline-focused sales-below-cost (SBC) laws for all gasoline station fuel sales in the
commonwealth. The commission shall seek to find the quantifiable effects of gasoline-focused
sales-below-cost laws in the commonwealth. The study shall seek to use an econometric fixed-
effects model with longitudinal and state panel data to examine the effects of SBC laws on the
weighted average price of unleaded gasoline, the wholesale price of gasoline, and the number of
sellers in the retail gasoline sector. The commission shall investigate states in the United States
that do not have SBC laws and determine the feasibility of instituting a similar approach in the
commonwealth. The commission shall make determinations on the economic feasibility of
of 2

repealing SBC laws in the commonwealth. The commission shall take into account market
concentration, wholesale prices, and retail prices. The commission shall make recommendations
on guidelines and approaches to dealing with SBC laws and estimates of potential savings for
consumers. The commission's recommendations may include but are not limited to retaining the
law, raising or lowering the gasoline price floor, or repealing the law entirely. The commission
shall seek input from statisticians and econometricians to determine the best method to model
and approach this topic to achieve the most robust and sound results.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on economic development and emerging technologies, who shall serve as the co-
chairs; the speaker of the house of representatives or a designee; the president of the senate or a
designee; the house minority leader or a designee; the senate minority leader or designee; and 4
persons who have extensive knowledge in the economics of industrial organization, consumer
welfare, and statistical methodologies, who shall be appointed by the chairs in consultation with
the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston. The commission shall hold no less than four public
hearings.
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its report and findings, along with any
recommendations, to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee
on economic development and emerging technologies, and the clerk of the house of
representatives and the clerk of the senate 12 months after the passage of this legislation.
of 2